Vermont, session 2025-2026, S128.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 383 is amended to read:
§ 383. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor or designee.
VT LEG #380181 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.128
2025 Page 2 of 5
(2) “Employee” means any individual employed or permitted to work by
an employer except:
(A) any individual employed in agriculture, provided the individual is
the agricultural employer’s parent, spouse, or child;
(B) any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private
home;
(C) any individual employed by the United States; or
(D) any individual employed in the activities of a public supported
nonprofit organization, except laundry employees, nurses’ aides, or practical
nurses;
(E)(C) any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity;
(F) any individual making home deliveries of newspapers or
advertising;
(G) taxi-cab drivers;
(H) outside salespersons; and
(I) students working during all or any part of the school year or
regular vacation periods.
(3) “Employer” means any person that employs two or more employees.
(4) “Occupation” means an industry, trade, or business or branch thereof
or class of work in which workers are gainfully employed.
VT LEG #380181 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.128
2025 Page 3 of 5
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 384 is amended to read:
§ 384. EMPLOYMENT; WAGES
(a)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2022 2026, an employer shall not employ
any employee at a rate of less than $12.55 $25.00 per hour, and on each
subsequent January 1, the minimum wage rate shall be increased by five
percent or the percentage increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S.
city average, not seasonally adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by the
U.S. Department of Labor or successor agency for the 12 months preceding the
previous September 1, whichever is smaller, but in no event shall the minimum
wage be decreased. The minimum wage shall be rounded off to the nearest
$0.01.
(2) An employer in the hotel, motel, tourist place, and restaurant
industry shall not employ a service or tipped employee at a basic wage rate less
than one-half the minimum wage. Beginning on January 1, 2026, an employer
shall not employee a service or tipped employee at a basic wage of less than
the minimum wage established pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
As used in this subdivision, “a service or tipped employee” means an employee
of a hotel, motel, tourist place, or restaurant who customarily and regularly
receives more than $120.00 per month in tips for direct and personal customer
service.
* * *
VT LEG #380181 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.128
2025 Page 4 of 5
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 751b is amended to read:
§ 751b. GENERAL PROVISIONS GOVERNING OFFENDER WORK
* * *
(b) An offender shall not be required to engage in unreasonable labor or to
perform any work for which he or she the offender is declared unfit by a
physician employed or retained by the Department.
(c)(1) The Commissioner shall establish written guidelines governing the
hours and conditions of offender work, and the rates of compensation of
offenders for employment. An offender shall be compensated at a rate that is
equal to or greater than the minimum wage established pursuant to 21 V.S.A.
§ 384(a)(1) unless a different wage is required for the offender’s position
pursuant to federal law.
(2) Wage payments of offenders shall be set aside in a separate fund.
(3) The guidelines of the Department may provide for the making of
deductions from wages of offenders to defray part or all of the cost of offender
maintenance or payments to victims of crime. The guidelines may also
provide for the setting aside by the Department of a portion of an offender’s
wages to enable the offender to contribute to the support of his or her the
offender’s dependents, if any,; to make necessary purchases from a
commissary,; to purchase approved books, instruments, and instruction not
VT LEG #380181 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.128
2025 Page 5 of 5
supplied by a correctional facility,; and to set aside sums to be paid to the
offender upon release from the custody or supervision of the Commissioner.
(4) Any interest that accrues from these wages during the period of such
custody of an offender shall be credited to any fund maintained by the
correctional facility for the welfare of offenders.
* * *
Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS WAGE POLICIES; UPDATE
On or before January 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Corrections shall update
all Department of Corrections policies relating to inmate wages to comply with
the requirements of 28 V.S.A. § 751b.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380181 v.1